test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-a_42odd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ihminen - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'menneske' - ei tsekattu
     sininen+A+Sg+Nom: sininen
     sininen+A+Sg+Gen: sinisen
     sininen+A+Sg+Par: sinistä
     sininen+A+Sg+Tra: siniseksi
     sininen+A+Sg+Abe: sinisettä
     sininen+A+Sg+Ine: sinisessä
     sininen+A+Sg+Ela: sinisestä
     sininen+A+Sg+Ill: sinisheen
     sininen+A+Sg+Ade: sinisellä
     sininen+A+Sg+Abl: siniseltä
     sininen+A+Sg+All: siniselle
     sininen+A+Sg+Ess: sinisennä
     sininen+A+Pl+Nom: siniset
     sininen+A+Pl+Gen: sinisten
     sininen+A+Pl+Par: [sinissii, sinisii]
     sininen+A+Pl+Tra: sinisiksi
     sininen+A+Pl+Abe: sinisittä
     sininen+A+Pl+Ine: sinisissä
     sininen+A+Pl+Ela: sinisistä
     sininen+A+Pl+Ill: sinishiin
     sininen+A+Pl+Ade: sinisillä
     sininen+A+Pl+Abl: sinisiltä
     sininen+A+Pl+All: sinisille
     sininen+A+Pl+Ess: sinisinnä
     sininen+A+Pl+Com: sinisine
     
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Nom: sinisempi
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Gen: sinisemmän
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Par: sinisemppää
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Tra: sinisemmäksi
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Abe: sinisemmättä
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Ine: sinisemmässä
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Ela: sinisemmästä
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Ill: sinisemphään
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Ade: sinisemmälä
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Abl: sinisemmältä
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+All: sinisemmäle
     sininen+A+Sg+Comp+Ess: sinisempänä
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Nom: sinisemmät
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Gen: sinisemmiitten
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Par: [sinisemppii, sinisemppiitä, sinisempiä]
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Tra: sinisemmiksi
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Abe: sinisemmittä
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Ine: sinisemmissä
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Ela: sinisemmistä
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Ill: sinisemphiin
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Ade: sinisemmilä
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Abl: sinisemmiltä
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+All: sinisemmile
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Ess: sinisempinä
     sininen+A+Pl+Comp+Com: sinisempine
     
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Nom: sinissiin
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Gen: sinissiimän
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Par: [sinissiintä, sinisiintä] # yksi (s) Eira syks 2013 s.106 tai 147
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Tra: sinisimmäksi
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Abe: sinisimmättä
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Ine: sinisimmässä
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Ela: sinisimmästä
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Ill: sinisimphään
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Ade: sinisimmälä
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Abl: sinisimmältä
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+All: sinisimmäle
     sininen+A+Sg+Superl+Ess: sinisimpänä
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Nom: sinisimmät
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Gen: sinisimmiitten
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Par: [sinissiimppii, sinissiimppiitä, sinisiimpiä] # yksi (s) Eira syks 2013 s.106 tai 147
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Tra: sinisimmiksi
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Abe: sinisimmittä
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Ine: sinisimmissä
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Ela: sinisimmistä
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Ill: sinisimphiin
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Ade: sinisimmilä
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Abl: sinisimmiltä
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+All: sinisimmile
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Ess: sinisimpinä
     sininen+A+Pl+Superl+Com: sinisimpine
